Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-254
Admission of additional general partners.

After the filing of a limited partnership's original certificate of limited partnership, additional general partners may be admitted as provided in the partnership agreement or, if the partnership agreement does not provide for the admission of additional general partners, with the written consent of all partners.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 22;

Laws 1982, LB 589, § 5;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 29.